Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB272.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.307 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Dysgraphia" has the same meaning as in KRS 158.305;
(b) "Dyslexia" means a specific learning disability that is neurological in origin. It
is characterized by difficulties with accurate or fluent word recognition and by
poor spelling and decoding abilities. These difficulties typically result from a
deficit in the phonological component of language that is often unexpected in
relation to other cognitive abilities and the provision of effective classroom
instruction. Secondary consequences may include problems in reading
comprehension and reduced reading experience that can impede the growth of
vocabulary and background knowledge;
(c)[(b)] "Evidence-based" has the same meaning as in 20 U.S.C. sec. 7801(21);
and
(d)[(c)] "Phonemic awareness" means the ability to recognize that a spoken
word consists of a sequence of individual sounds and the ability to manipulate
individual sounds in speaking.
(2) [By January 1, 2019, ]The department [of Education ]shall make available a
dyslexia toolkit that includes guidance, technical assistance, and training to assist
all local school districts in the implementation of evidence-based practices for
instructing students identified with or displaying characteristics of dyslexia,
dysgraphia, and other reading and writing difficulties. The department shall
annually review and update, where appropriate, the dyslexia toolkit guidance
identified in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The dyslexia toolkit shall include but not be limited to the following guidance for
local districts targeting students in kindergarten through grade three (3) who have
Page 1 of 6
BR121500.100 - 1215 - XXXX 2/25/2025 3:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1215
been identified with or displaying characteristics of dyslexia, dysgraphia, and other
reading and writing difficulties:
(a) Definitions and characteristics of dyslexia, dysgraphia, and other reading
and writing difficulties for students;
(b) Recommended procedures for the evaluation, identification, and ongoing
monitoring of students with reading and writing difficulties;
(c) Evidence-based practices designed specifically for students with dyslexia,
dysgraphia, and other reading and writing difficulties;
(d)[(b)] Characteristics of targeted instruction for dyslexia, dysgraphia, and
other reading and writing difficulties, including instructional tools
identified in KRS 158.305(11)(b);
(e)[(c)] Guidance on developing instructional plans for students with dyslexia,
dysgraphia, and other reading and writing difficulties;
(f)[(d)] Best practices toward meaning-centered reading and writing;
(g)[(e)] Structured multisensory and literacy approaches to teaching language
and reading skills; and
(h)[(f)] Suggested professional development activities.
(4) The department shall collaborate with the Education Professional Standards Board,
Council on Postsecondary Education, and other groups as necessary to improve and
update professional development opportunities for teachers specifically related to
dyslexia. Professional development opportunities may focus on:
(a) Development and ongoing implementation of training and coaching for
teachers;
(b) Identifying high-quality trainers to provide support to local districts utilizing a
coaching model to develop building level dyslexia experts;
(c) Developing awareness training modules for all instructional staff to include
information about characteristics of dyslexia; and
Page 2 of 6
BR121500.100 - 1215 - XXXX 2/25/2025 3:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1215
(d) Evidence-based interventions, structured multisensory and literacy approaches
to teach language and reading skills, and accommodations for dyslexia and
other specific learning disabilities.
(5) Each local board of education shall[may] develop a policy addressing the
implementation of a program for the identification of and strategies for assisting
students in kindergarten through grade three (3) with dyslexia.
(6) The local board policies shall[may] include but not be limited to:
(a) The definition and characteristics of dyslexia;
(b) A process for identifying students who are displaying characteristics of
dyslexia;
(c) A process for the utilization of evaluation tools to accurately identify students
who are displaying characteristics of dyslexia. Any qualified dyslexia
evaluation tool utilized by a local district shall address but not be limited to
the following components:
1. Phonological awareness and phonemic awareness;
2. Sound symbol recognition;
3. Alphabet knowledge;
4. Decoding skills;
5. Encoding skills; and
6. Rapid naming;
(d) A process for how evaluation tools are administered and evaluated by trained
district personnel or licensed professionals;
(e) A process for outreach to parents of students identified with or displaying the
characteristics of dyslexia with information and resource materials and how
dyslexia may be addressed in the student's educational setting;
(f) Identification of evidence-based interventions, structured multisensory and
literacy approaches to teach language and reading skills, and accommodations
Page 3 of 6
BR121500.100 - 1215 - XXXX 2/25/2025 3:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1215
that schools may utilize to provide services to students identified as having
dyslexia; and
(g) A process for monitoring a student's progress after the positive identification,
including assessments to ascertain whether the intervention services improve
the student's language processing and reading skills.
(7) By June 30 of each year, each local school district [that developed a policy
addressing the implementation of a program for the identification of and strategies
for assisting students in kindergarten through grade three (3) with dyslexia ]shall
provide the department the following data for the current school year:
(a) The number of students in kindergarten through grade three (3) that were
identified as displaying characteristics of dyslexia;
(b) The number of students in paragraph (a) of this subsection that were identified
through the response-to-intervention process;
(c) The number of students in kindergarten through grade three (3) that were
evaluated for dyslexia;
(d) The number of students in kindergarten through grade three (3) that were
identified with dyslexia;
(e) The dyslexia evaluation tools used to identify students;
(f) The number of students in kindergarten through grade three (3) that were
participating in interventions within the school setting;
(g) The process or tools used to evaluate student progress; and
(h) The number of trained district personnel or licensed professionals used to
administer the dyslexia evaluation tools.
(8) The department shall annually compile and maintain the data provided in
accordance with subsection (7) of this section. No later than November 1 of each
year, the department shall submit a report to the Legislative Research
Commission for referral to the appropriate Interim Joint Committee on
Page 4 of 6
BR121500.100 - 1215 - XXXX 2/25/2025 3:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1215
Education including the information compiled in accordance with this subsection
for the most recently reported school year.
(9) (a) The department shall establish a study project to gather information on early
screening and intervention services for children with characteristics of
dyslexia. The commissioner of education shall select three (3) school districts
to participate in the study project, one (1) of which shall be located in an
urban setting, one (1) of which shall be located in a suburban setting, and one
(1) of which shall be located in a rural setting.
(b) The department shall establish guidelines and procedures for the study
project.
(c) The study project shall operate for three (3) full school years, beginning with
the school year that begins at least three (3) months after July 14, 2018.
(d) The goal of the study project shall be to evaluate the effectiveness of early
reading assistance programs for children with characteristics of dyslexia.
(e) The commissioner may consult with recognized organizations that specialize
in structured literacy programs for the treatment of dyslexia in establishing
and operating the study project.
(f) The department shall submit a final report outlining the findings of the study
to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the appropriate
Interim Joint Committee on Education by November 1 after the final
academic year of the study project.
Section 2. KRS 164.304 is amended to read as follows:
By the 2026-2027[2019-2020] academic year, postsecondary institutions offering teacher
preparation programs for elementary and secondary regular education shall[, subject to
available funds,] include instruction on:
(1) The definition and characteristics of dyslexia;
(2) Processes for identifying dyslexia;
Page 5 of 6
BR121500.100 - 1215 - XXXX 2/25/2025 3:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1215
(3) Evidence-based interventions and accommodations for dyslexia and other disorders
defined in KRS 158.305 and related literacy and learning challenges; and
(4) Core elements of a response-to-intervention framework addressing reading, writing,
mathematics, and behavior, including;
(a) Universal screening;
(b) Evidence-based research interventions;
(c) Progress monitoring of the effectiveness of interventions on student
performance;
(d) Data-based decision-making procedures related to:
1. Determining intervention effectiveness on student performance; and
2. Determining the need to continue, alter, or discontinue interventions or
conduct further evaluation of student needs; and
(e) Application and implementation of response-to-intervention and dyslexia
instructional practices in the classroom setting.
Page 6 of 6
BR121500.100 - 1215 - XXXX 2/25/2025 3:16 PM Jacketed